Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 2-101, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 190, O.S.L. 2025 (37A O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 2-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101. A. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the licenses issued by the ABLE Alcoholic Beverage Laws
Enforcement (ABLE) Commission, and the annual fees therefor, shall
be as follows:
1. Brewer License.................................. $1,250.00
2. Small Brewer License.............................. $125.00
3. Distiller License............................... $3,125.00
4. Winemaker License................................. $625.00
5. Small Farm Winery License.......................... $75.00
6. Rectifier License............................... $3,125.00
7. Wine and Spirits Wholesaler License............. $3,000.00
8. Beer Distributor License.......................... $750.00
9. The following retail spirits license fees
shall be determined by the latest Federal
Decennial Census:
a. Retail Spirits License for cities and
towns from 200 to 2,500 population.......... $305.00
b. Retail Spirits License for cities and
towns from 2,501 to 5,000 population........ $605.00
c. Retail Spirits License for cities and
towns over 5,000 population................. $905.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

10. Retail Wine License............................ $1,000.00
11. Retail Beer License.............................. $500.00
12. Mixed Beverage License......................... $1,005.00
(initial license)
$905.00
(renewal)
13. Mixed Beverage/Caterer Combination License..... $1,250.00
14. On-Premises Beer and Wine License................ $500.00
(initial license)
$450.00
(renewal)
15. Bottle Club License............................ $1,000.00
(initial license)
$900.00
(renewal)
16. Caterer License................................ $1,005.00
(initial license)
$905.00
(renewal)
17. Annual Special Event License...................... $55.00
18. Quarterly Special Event License................... $55.00
19. Hotel Beverage License......................... $1,005.00
(initial license)
$905.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(renewal)
20. Airline/Railroad/Commercial Passenger Vessel Beverage
License........................................ $1,005.00
(initial license)
$905.00
(renewal)
21. Agent License..................................... $55.00
22. Employee License.................................. $30.00
23. Industrial License................................ $23.00
24. Carrier License................................... $23.00
25. Private Carrier License........................... $23.00
26. Bonded Warehouse License......................... $190.00
27. Storage License................................... $23.00
28. Nonresident Seller License ...................... $750.00
29. Manufacturer License:
a. 50 cases or less sold in Oklahoma in
last calendar year........................... $50.00
b. 51 to 500 cases sold in Oklahoma in
last calendar year........................... $75.00
c. 501 cases or more sold in Oklahoma in
last calendar year.......................... $150.00
30. Manufacturer’s Agent License...................... $55.00
31. Sacramental Wine Supplier License................ $100.00
32. Charitable Auction License......................... $1.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

33. Charitable Alcoholic Beverage License............. $55.00
34. Winemaker Self-Distribution License:
a. produced ten thousand (10,000) gallons
or less in last calendar year............... $350.00
b. produced more than ten thousand
(10,000) gallons but no more than
fifteen thousand (15,000) gallons in
last calendar year.......................... $750.00
35. Annual Public Event License.................... $1,005.00
36. One-Time Public Event License.................... $255.00
37. Small Brewer Self-Distribution License:
a. produced fifteen thousand (15,000)
barrels or less in last calendar year....... $350.00
b. produced more than fifteen thousand
(15,000) barrels in last calendar year...... $750.00
38. Brewpub License................................ $1,005.00
39. Brewpub Self-Distribution License................ $750.00
40. Complimentary Beverage License.................... $75.00
41. Satellite Tasting Room License................... $100.00
42. Event Bartender License........................... $50.00
43. Exotic Entertainer License........................ $30.00
44. Exotic Entertainment Business License.......... $1,000.00
B. 1. There shall be added to the initial or renewal fees for
a mixed beverage license an administrative fee, which shall not be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

deem ed to be a license fee, in the amount of Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00), which shall be paid at the same time and in the same
manner as the license fees prescribed by paragraph 12 of subsection
A of this section; provided, this fee shall not be assessed against
service organizations or fraternal beneficiary societies which are
exempt under Section 501(c)(19), (8), or (10) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
2. There shall be added to the fee for a mixed beverage/caterer
combination license an administrative fee, which shall not be deemed
to be a license fee, in the amount of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars
($250.00), which shall be paid at the same time and in the same
manner as the license fee prescribed by paragraph 13 of subsection A
of this section.
C. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this
section:
1. The license fee for a mixed beverage or bottle club license
for those service organizations or fraternal beneficiary societies
which are exempt under Section 501(c)(19), (8), or (10) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall be Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) per year; and
2. The renewal fee for an airline/railroad/commercial passenger
vessel beverage license held by a railroad described in 49 U.S.C.,
Section 24301, shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. An applicant may apply for and receive both an on-premises
beer and wine license and a caterer license.
E. All licenses, except as otherwise provided, shall be valid
for one (1) year from date of issuance unless revoked or
surrendered. Provided, all employee licenses shall be valid for two
(2) years.
F. The holder of a license, issued by the ABLE Commission, for
a bottle club located in a county of this state where the sale of
alcoholic beverages by the individual drink for on-premises
consumption has been authorized, may exchange the bottle club
license for a mixed beverage license or an on-premises beer and wine
license and operate the licensed premises as a mixed beverage
establishment or an on-premises beer and wine establishment subject
to the provisions of the Oklahoma Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.
There shall be no additional fee for such exchange and the mixed
beverage license or on-premises beer and wine license issued shall
expire one (1) year from the date of issuance of the original bottle
club license.
G. In addition to the applicable licensing fee, the following
surcharge shall be assessed annually on the following licenses:
1. Nonresident Seller License...................... $2,500.00
2. Manufacturer License:
a. 50 cases or less sold in Oklahoma in
last calendar year.......................... $100.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. 51 to 500 cases sold in Oklahoma in
last calendar year.......................... $225.00
c. 501 cases or more sold in Oklahoma in
last calendar year.......................... $450.00
3. Wine and Spirits Wholesaler License............. $2,500.00
4. Beer Distributor................................ $1,000.00
5. Retail Spirits License for cities and towns
over 5,000 population.......................... $250.00
6. Retail Spirits License for cities and towns
from 2,501 to 5,000 population................. $200.00
7. Retail Spirits License for cities and towns
from 200 to 2,500 population................... $150.00
8. Retail Wine License............................... $250.00
9. Retail Beer License............................... $250.00
10. Mixed Beverage License............................ $25.00
11. Mixed Beverage/Caterer Combination License........ $25.00
12. Caterer License................................... $25.00
13. On-Premises Beer and Wine License................. $25.00
14. Annual Public Event License....................... $25.00
15. Small Farm Winery License......................... $25.00
16. Small Brewer License.............................. $35.00
17. Complimentary Beverage License.................... $25.00
18. Exotic Entertainer License......................... $3.00
19. Exotic Entertainer Business License............ $1,000.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The surcharge shall be paid concurrent with the licensee’s
annual licensing fee and, in addition to Five Dollars ($5.00) of the
employee license fee, shall be deposited in the Alcoholic Beverage
Governance Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 5-128 of
this title.
H. Any license issued by the ABLE Commission under this title
may be relied upon by other licensees as a valid license, and no
other licensee shall have any obligation to independently determine
the validity of such license or be held liable solely as a
consequence of another licensee’s failure to maintain a valid
license.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.5, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 404, O.S.L. 2025 (51 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 24A.5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 24A.5. All records of public bodies and public
officials shall be open to any person for inspection, copying, or
mechanical reproduction during regular business hours; provided:
1. The Oklahoma Open Records Act, Sections 24A.1 through 24A.34
of this title, does not apply to records specifically required by
law to be kept confidential including:
a. records protected by a state evidentiary privilege
such as the attorney-client privilege, the work
product immunity from discovery and the identity of
informer privileges,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. records of what transpired during meetings of a public
body lawfully closed to the public such as executive
sessions authorized under the Oklahoma Open Meeting
Act,
c. personal information within driver records as defined
by the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18
U.S.C., Sections 2721 through 2725,
d. information in the files of the Board of Medicolegal
Investigations obtained pursuant to Sections 940 and
941 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes that may be
hearsay, preliminary unsubstantiated investigation-
related findings, or confidential medical information,
e. any test forms, question banks and answer keys
developed for state licensure examinations, but
specifically excluding test preparation materials or
study guides,
f. last names, addresses, Social Security numbers or tax
identification numbers, and proof of identification
submitted to the Oklahoma Lottery Commission by
persons claiming a lottery prize,
g. unless public disclosure is required by other laws or
regulations, vehicle movement records of the Oklahoma
Transportation Authority obtained in connection with
the Authority’s electronic toll collection system,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

h. personal financial information, credit reports, or
other financial data obtained by or submitted to a
public body for the purpose of evaluating credit
worthiness creditworthiness, obtaining a license, or
permit, or for the purpose of becoming qualified to
contract with a public body,
i. any digital audio/video recordings of the toll
collection and safeguarding activities of the Oklahoma
Transportation Authority,
j. any personal information provided by a guest at any
facility owned or operated by the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Department to obtain any service at the
facility or by a purchaser of a product sold by or
through the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department,
k. a United States Department of Defense Form 214 (DD
Form 214) filed with a county clerk, including any DD
Form 214 filed before July 1, 2002,
l. except as provided for in Section 2-110 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes:
(1) any record in connection with a Motor Vehicle
Report issued by the Department of Public Safety,
as prescribed in Section 6-117 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(2) personal information within driver records, as
defined by the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of
1994, 18 U.S.C., Sections 2721 through 2725,
which are stored and maintained by the Department
of Public Safety,
m. any portion of any document or information provided to
an agency or entity of the state or a political
subdivision to obtain licensure under the laws of this
state or a political subdivision that contains an
applicant’s personal address, personal phone number,
personal email address, any government-issued
identification numbers, or other contact information;
provided, however, lists of persons licensed, the
existence of a license of a person, or a business or
commercial address, or other business or commercial
information disclosable under state law submitted with
an application for licensure shall be public record,
unless the business or commercial address is the same
as the applicant’s personal address, except when the
applicant permits in writing the disclosure of the
address; provided, however, in no event shall personal
identifying information related to an exotic
entertainer license established pursuant to this act
be subject to public disclosure,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

n. an investigative file obtained during an investigation
conducted by the State Department of Health into
violations of the Long-Term Care Administrator
Licensing Act under Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
or
o. documents, evidence, materials, records, reports,
complaints, or other information in the possession or
control of the Attorney General or Insurance
Department pertaining to an evaluation, examination,
investigation, or review made pursuant to the
provisions of the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice
Act, the Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act, or Sections 357
through 360 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. All Social Security numbers included in a record may be
confidential regardless of the person’s status as a public employee
or private individual and may be redacted or deleted prior to
release of the record by the public body;
3. Any reasonably segregable portion of a record containing
exempt material shall be provided after deletion of the exempt
portions; provided, however, the Department of Public Safety shall
not be required to assemble for the requesting person specific
information, in any format, from driving records relating to any
person whose name and date of birth or whose driver license number
is not furnished by the requesting person.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall not be required
to assemble for the requesting person any criminal history records
relating to persons whose names, dates of birth, and other
identifying information required by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation pursuant to administrative rule are not furnished by
the requesting person;
4. Any request for a record which contains individual records
of persons, and the cost of copying, reproducing or certifying each
individual record is otherwise prescribed by state law, the cost may
be assessed for each individual record, or portion thereof requested
as prescribed by state law. Otherwise, a public body may charge a
fee only for recovery of the reasonable, direct costs of record
copying, or mechanical reproduction. Notwithstanding any state or
local provision to the contrary, in no instance shall the record
copying fee exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per page for records
having the dimensions of eight and one-half (8 1/2) by fourteen (14)
inches or smaller, or a maximum of One Dollar ($1.00) per copied
page for a certified copy. However, if the request:
a. is solely for commercial purpose, or
b. would clearly cause excessive disruption of the
essential functions of the public body,
then the public body may charge a reasonable fee to recover the
direct cost of record search and copying; however, publication in a
newspaper or broadcast by news media for news purposes shall not
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cons titute a resale or use of a record for trade or commercial
purpose and charges for providing copies of electronic data to the
news media for a news purpose shall not exceed the direct cost of
making the copy. The fee charged by the Department of Public Safety
for a copy in a computerized format of a record of the Department
shall not exceed the direct cost of making the copy unless the fee
for the record is otherwise set by law. A public body may require
advance payment of the estimated fees authorized under this section
when the estimated cost exceeds Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) or if
the requestor has outstanding fees from previous requests. Any
portion of an advance payment that exceeds the costs of responding
to the request shall be returned to the requestor.
Any public body establishing fees under the Oklahoma Open
Records Act shall post a written schedule of the fees at its
principal office and with the county clerk.
In no case shall a search fee be charged when the release of
records is in the public interest, including, but not limited to,
release to the news media, scholars, authors and taxpayers seeking
to determine whether those entrusted with the affairs of the
government are honestly, faithfully, and competently performing
their duties as public servants.
The fees shall not be used for the purpose of discouraging
requests for information or as obstacles to disclosure of requested
information;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. The land description tract index of all recorded instruments
concerning real property required to be kept by the county clerk of
any county shall be available for inspection or copying in
accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Records Act;
provided, however, the index shall not be copied or mechanically
reproduced for the purpose of sale of the information;
6. A public body must provide prompt, reasonable access to its
records but may establish reasonable procedures which protect the
integrity and organization of its records and to prevent excessive
disruptions of its essential functions. A delay in providing access
to records shall be limited solely to the time required for
preparing the requested documents and the avoidance of excessive
disruptions of the public body’s essential functions. In no event
may production of a current request for records be unreasonably
delayed until after completion of a prior records request that will
take substantially longer than the current request. Any public body
which makes the requested records available on the Internet shall
meet the obligation of providing prompt, reasonable access to its
records as required by this paragraph;
7. A public body may require a requestor to complete a records
request form. If a records request does not describe the requested
records with reasonable specificity, a public body may ask the
requestor to clarify the request. To have reasonable specificity, a
request shall:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. specify a general time frame within which the
requested records would have been created or
transmitted,
b. seek identifiable records, rather than general
information without any qualifiers or other
specifications, and
c. include search terms that are sufficiently specific to
assist the public body in identifying the requested
records.
If a public body has engaged with the requestor to seek the
information needed to fulfill the request and to identify the
records sought by the requestor, including providing the requestor
with general topics or a specific list of records related to the
request, the request may be denied if it is still not reasonably
specific; and
8. A public body shall designate certain persons who are
authorized to release records of the public body for inspection,
copying, or mechanical reproduction. At least one person shall be
available at all times to release records during the regular
business hours of the public body.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6006.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Sections 3 through 7 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the “Exotic Entertainer Licensing Act”.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6006.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Exotic entertainer” means any person who performs in a
state of semi-nudity including, but not limited to, dancing,
stripping, or engaging in sexually suggestive or lascivious conduct
in an exotic entertainer business;
2. “Exotic entertainer business” means an adult cabaret or
sexually oriented business as defined in Section 1040.55 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes, that offers live entertainment
characterized by the exposure of persons in a state of nudity or
semi-nudity, or engaging in sexually suggestive or lascivious
conduct;
3. “Lascivious” means the exposure of genitals, pubic area,
anus, or female breast below a horizontal line across the top of the
areola, or any simulation of such area, with the intent to arouse or
gratify the sexual desire of any person;
4. “Semi-nude” means a state of dress in which clothing covers
no more than the genitals, pubic area, and areola of the female
breast, as well as portions of the body covered by supporting straps
or devices; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. “Sexually suggestive” means any act or performance in an
exotic entertainer business involving the fondling or erotic
touching or simulation of a person’s own or another person’s clothed
or unclothed genitals, pubic area, anus, or female breast.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6006.3 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any exotic entertainer business in this state shall obtain a
valid exotic entertainer business license issued by the Alcoholic
Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission pursuant to the provisions of
this act. No exotic entertainment business shall provide sexually
suggestive or lascivious entertainment or employ exotic entertainers
without obtaining an exotic entertainer business license. Such
license shall be renewed annually.
B. No person shall perform as an exotic entertainer in any
exotic entertainer business in this state without obtaining a valid
exotic entertainer license issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Laws
Enforcement Commission pursuant to the provisions of this act. Such
license shall be renewed annually. To qualify for issuance of an
exotic entertainer license, an applicant shall:
1. Be a citizen of the United States of America or an alien
lawfully admitted to the United States of America authorized to
engage in employment pursuant to the Immigration Reform and Control
Act of 1986, 8 U.S.C., Section 1101 et seq. as verified through the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fede ral E-Verify program or a successor program approved by the
United States Department of Homeland Security;
2. Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
3. Have not been convicted of any felony violations of Section
748, 1021, or 1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
4. Provide verified proof of true identity, including a
government-issued photographic identification document.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6006.4 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No owner, operator, proprietor, or manager of an exotic
entertainer business shall knowingly permit any person to perform as
an exotic entertainer on the premises unless the person possesses a
valid exotic entertainer license. Prior to permitting any such
performance, the owner, operator, proprietor, or manager shall
verify the validity of the license.
B. Every owner, operator, proprietor, or manager of an exotic
entertainer business shall maintain, for each exotic entertainer who
performs on the premises, either a secure physical copy or a digital
copy that is protected against unauthorized access, of the exotic
entertainer’s valid license. Such records shall be maintained for a
minimum of twelve (12) months following the exotic entertainer’s
last performance on the premises and shall be made available
immediately for inspection upon request by the Alcoholic Beverage
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Laws Enforcement Commission, code enforcement officials, or state-
accredited law enforcement officers with jurisdiction.
C. All records for exotic entertainers including, but not
limited to, applications, personal contact information, schedule, or
any other identifying data submitted to and maintained by the owner,
operator, proprietor, or manager of an exotic entertainer business
and the Commission for the purposes of issuing, maintaining, or
revoking an exotic entertainer license shall be confidential and not
be open to public inspection or disclosure under Title 51 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the access of
confidential licensee information by code enforcement officials or
state-accredited law enforcement officers with jurisdiction for the
purposes of internal investigations and exemptions pursuant to
Section 24A.28 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
E. Failure to comply with the verification or record
maintenance requirements of this section shall constitute a separate
violation for each day of noncompliance.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6006.5 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. Any person who performs as an exotic entertainer without
a valid license, or after the expiration or revocation of a license,
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fine not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), by imprisonment
in the county jail for a period not to exceed one (1) year, or by
both such fine and imprisonment. The exotic entertainer license
shall be suspended for a period of twelve (12) months upon
conviction.
2. Any person who has a second or subsequent violation shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per offense, by imprisonment in the
county jail for a period not to exceed one (1) year, or by both such
fine and imprisonment. The exotic entertainer license shall be
permanently revoked upon conviction of any second or subsequent
violation.
B. Any exotic entertainer business found to have violated the
provisions of this act shall be subject to an administrative fine of
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per offense. A second or
subsequent violation shall subject the violator to an administrative
fine of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per offense and suspension
of all business licenses issued by the Commission to the offender
for a period of twelve (12) months.
C. Any owner, operator, proprietor, or manager of an exotic
entertainer business who knowingly violates the provisions of this
act shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine not more than
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment in the custody of
the Department of Corrections for a period not less than twelve (12)
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

mont hs and not more than thirty-six (36) months, or by both such
fine and imprisonment. A subsequent violation shall be punishable
by a fine not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), by
imprisonment for a period not less than twenty-four (24) months and
not more than sixty (60) months, or by both such fine and
imprisonment, and the person shall be permanently barred from owning
or operating an exotic entertainer business in this state.
D. Any administrative fines collected pursuant to this section
shall be credited to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Fund established
pursuant to Section 5-128 of Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1284 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)